Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Priority placement. new text end new text begin (a) If no reasonable accommodation under subdivision 6 is possible within the employee's current position, priority placement under this subdivision applies to any available positions for which the disabled employee meets the qualifications, subject to any reasonable accommodation requirements for the new position. An employer must provide priority placement in an open position to any employee who becomes disabled and is unable to perform the essential functions of their current role, provided that the employee is qualified for the open position. new text end new text begin (b) Priority placement means that the disabled employee must be considered before external candidates for any open role for which the employee is qualified and capable of performing with or without reasonable accommodation. new text end new text begin (c) This section applies to employers with more than 40,000 employees in the state. An employer subject to this subdivision must notify employees of their right to priority placement under this subdivision. new text end